Tennessee, session 114, HB1895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 43, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "classroom evacuation" means the removal of some
or all students from a classroom or instructional area due to the violent, aggressive, or
severely disruptive behavior of another student that creates a safety concern or
substantially interrupts classroom instruction.
(b) If a classroom evacuation occurs, the principal or the principal's designee
shall provide notification to the parent or legal guardian of each student who was
removed from the classroom no later than the end of the school day in which the
classroom evacuation occurred.
(c) The notification required under subsection (b) must include:
(1) The fact that a classroom evacuation occurred;
(2) A brief description of the general nature of the incident sufficient to
explain why the classroom evacuation occurred; and
(3) Any steps taken by the school to ensure the continued safety and
supervision of students.
(d) The notification must not disclose information about the student whose
conduct caused the classroom evacuation, or any other student, if the disclosure would
HB1895
010312
- 1 -

violate the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) (20 U.S.C. § 1232g), §
10-7-504, or any other relevant privacy law.
(e) Each school shall maintain, for each classroom evacuation, a written or
electronic record of:
(1) The date and time of the classroom evacuation;
(2) The number of students evacuated;
(3) The time and the manner of the parental notifications; and
(4) The staff member responsible for issuing parental notifications.
(f) The local board of education or public charter school governing board shall
adopt a policy to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010312